test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s5x30_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - avhenda: # 
    avhenda+V+Inf: avhenda
    avhenda+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [avhendir, avhendar]
    avhenda+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [avhendi, avhendaði]
    avhenda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [avhendu, avhendaðu]
    avhenda+V+Sup: [avhent, avhendað]
    avhenda+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [avhendur, avhendaður]
